North Carolina statutes. Chapter 76A. Navigation and Pilotage Commissions.
Article 2. Pilots.

§ 76A-12.
Apprentices.

The Commission when it deems necessary for the best interest of the State is hereby authorized to appoint in its discretion apprentices, none of whom shall be less than 21 years of age, and to make and enforce reasonable rules and regulations relating thereto. Apprentices shall serve for a minimum of one year but no longer than three years in order to be eligible for a limited license. The Commission shall adopt rules and regulations to monitor the progress of apprentices on a regular basis to assure the progressive development of knowledge and skill necessary to obtain a limited license.

History.

1981, c. 910, s. 1; 1987, c. 475.

§ 76A-13.
Pilotage association.

In consideration that a mutual association for pilots has been formed, is operational and is expedient for effective management, the Commission shall recognize such a proper pilot association formed for the smooth business transactions in the provision of services. However, the Commission may prescribe such reasonable rules and regulations for the governance of such associations in its direct relationship with the Commission as it deems necessary. Any licensed pilot refusing to become a member of such association shall be subject to suspension or have his license revoked, at the discretion of the Commission.

History.

1981, c. 910, s. 1.

§ 76A-14.
Number of pilots.

The Commission shall govern the number of pilots necessary to maintain an efficient pilotage service. Present active pilots shall continue to serve with the Commission’s power of reduction to be effective only in the case of natural attrition except as provided in

G.S. 76A-15

. At no time shall the number of active licensed pilots exceed 15. Docking masters shall not be deemed pilots for this section or any other section in this Chapter.

History.

1981, c. 910, s. 1.

§ 76A-15.
Pilot retirement.

The Commission shall have and is hereby given authority in its discretion and under such reasonable rules and regulations as it may prescribe to retire from active service any pilot who shall become physically or mentally unfit to perform a pilot’s duties. Provided, however, that no pilot shall be retired, except with his consent for physical or mental disability unless and until such pilots shall have first been examined by the public health officer or county physician of his respective county of residence and such public health officer or physician shall have certified to the board the fact of such physical or mental disability.

History.

1981, c. 910, s. 1.

§ 76A-16.
Compulsory use of pilots.

Every foreign vessel and every U.S. vessel sailing under register, including such vessels towing or being towed when underway in the Cape Fear River and Bar and over 60 gross tons, shall employ and take a State-licensed pilot, except when maneuvering during berthing or unberthing operations, shifting within the confine of ports or terminals, passing through bridges, with tug assistance and with a docking master aboard the vessel. Any master of a vessel violating this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor except as provided for in

G.S. 76A-18

.

History.

1981, c. 910, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 577; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 76A-17.
Pilotage rates.

The Commission shall set charges for pilotage services on a published tariff basis to be reviewed and revised annually as necessary. The initial publication of rates and subsequent revisions shall be preceded by public notice at least 30 days prior to publication. The rates may be based on the method chosen by the Commission and may be varied on a geographic or other basis which the Commission deems appropriate. In establishing pilotage rates the Commission shall consider but not be limited to factors such as vessels’ lengths, vessels’ drafts, general design of vessels, distances for which pilotage services are to be provided, nature of waters to be traversed and the rates for comparable pilotage services in other ports.

History.

1981, c. 910, s. 1.

§ 76A-18.
Vessels not liable for pilotage.

Any vessel coming in from sea for harborage without the assistance of a pilot the wind and weather being such that such assistance or service could not have been reasonably given, shall not be liable for pilotage inward from sea.

History.

1981, c. 910, s. 1.

§§ 76A-19 through 76A-23.

Reserved for future codification purposes.